District of Columbia statutes.
18-102

Capacity to make a will.

A will, testament, or codicil is not valid for any purpose unless the person making it is at least 18 years of age and, at the time of executing or acknowledging it as provided by this chapter, of sound and disposing mind and capable of executing a valid deed or contract.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 686, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 4(a), 23 DCR 1180

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-102.
1973 Ed., § 18-102.